Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-104.07
American Indian Day; manner of observance.

It is hereby declared that the fourth Monday in September of each year shall be known in Nebraska as American Indian Day and that on this day schools, clubs, and civic and religious organizations shall be encouraged to recognize the contributions of American Indians with suitable ceremony and fellowship designed to promote greater understanding and brotherhood between American Indians and the non-Indian people of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1983, LB 90, § 2.